Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1808
Refund; procedure.

An intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities that
has paid a tax that is not required by section 68-1803 may file a claim for
refund with the department. The department may by rule and regulation establish
procedures for filing and consideration of such claims.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 9;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 24.